Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§103D-101 Requirements of ethical public
procurement. (a) All public employees shall conduct and participate in
public procurement in an ethical manner. In conducting and participating in
procurement, public employees shall:

(1) Act as a fiduciary and trustee of public moneys;

(2) Remain independent from any actual or prospective
bidder, offeror, contractor, or business;

(3) Act only in the public interest;

(4) Abide by the statutes and administrative rules
relating to public procurement;

(5) Identify and maximize efficiencies in the public
procurement process;

(6) Encourage economic competition by:

(A) Ensuring that all persons are afforded an
equal opportunity to compete in a fair and open environment; and

(B) Researching innovative goods and services
to meet the public's needs;

(7) Avoid the intent and appearance of unethical
behavior;

(8) Avoid social interactions with any actual or
prospective bidder, offeror, contractor, business, or other interested parties
during the procurement process;

(9) Maintain confidentiality in a manner that ensures
a fair procurement process;

(10) Remain impartial in dealings with any actual or
prospective bidder, offeror, contractor, business, or other interested parties;
and

(11) Identify and eliminate any conflicts of interest.

(b) Any actual or prospective bidder, offeror,
[contractor], or business taking part in the conduct of public procurement,
shall act in good faith to practice purchasing ethics, and when applicable, display
business integrity as a responsible offeror through the public procurement
process, including but not limited to the following:

(1) Avoiding the intent and appearance of unethical
behavior or business practices;

(2) Refraining from any activity that would create
the appearance of impropriety or conflicts of personal interest and the
interests of the State or counties;

(3) Identifying and eliminating any conflicts of
interest; and

(4) Ensuring that all persons are afforded an equal
opportunity to compete in a fair and open environment.

(c) All parties involved in the negotiation,
performance, or administration of state contracts shall act in good faith. [L
Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 207, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next